California, session 20252026, AB1509.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 91 is added to the Military and Veterans Code, to read:91. (a) The California State Accrediting Agency for Veterans Education (CSAAVE) is hereby created within the department.(b) The CSAAVE shall implement federal requirements and administer state requirements for an organization seeking authorization to offer awards under Chapter 36 of Title 38 of the United States Code and Subpart D of Part 21 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations for a state approving agency.(c) (1) The department may adopt regulations to implement Chapter 36 of Title 38 of the United States Code, Subpart D of Part 21 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and this section.(2) The department may amend regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to account for changes in state or federal statutes and regulations.(3) The Secretary of Veterans Affairs has signatory authority for the CSAAVE in adherence with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).